Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1175.
do enact as follows:AB1175,13Section 1. 5.02 (6m) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1175,2,645.02 (6m) (f) An unexpired identification card issued by a university or college 5in this state that is accredited, as defined in s. 39.30 (1) (d), or by a technical college 1in this state that is a member of and governed by the technical college system under 2ch. 38, that contains the date of issuance and signature of the individual to whom it 3is issued and that contains an expiration date indicating that the card expires no 4later than 2 6 years after the date of issuance if the individual establishes that he 5or she is enrolled as a student at the university or college on the date that the card 6is presented.AB1175,2,77